Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1507
Eligibility; department determine.

The determination of disability and the need for programs and services shall be supported by current program plans, evaluations, and medical reports which shall be provided to the department upon request. The department may decide that additional evaluations of the disabled person are necessary to determine eligibility or the need for programs and services. Such additional evaluations shall be provided by the department.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 7.